Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 13.40.560 (Juvenile accountability incentive account) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 624 & 1999 c 182 s 1;(2) RCW 19.385.030 (Internet consumer access account) and 2018 c 5 s 3;(3) RCW 28B.50.286 (Opportunity express account) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 24 s 5;(4) RCW 43.07.388 (Washington state flag account) and 2009 c 71 s 2;(5) RCW 43.19.035 (Commemorative works account) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 203 & 2005 c 16 s 1;(6) RCW 43.63A.766 (Building communities fund account) and 2008 c 327 s 14;(7) RCW 43.79.574 (Stadium world cup capital accountâLoans for capital improvements for 2026 world cup) and 2024 c 168 s 9;(8) RCW 43.79A.041 (Millersylvania park trust fundâInvestment authority) and 2012 c 187 s 12;(9) RCW 43.83.360 (State social and health services construction accountâDefinition) and 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 36, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 56, 1985 c 57 s 49, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 125 s 3;(10) RCW 43.135.045 (Education construction fundâAppropriation conditions) and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 934 & 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 5;(11) RCW 47.76.450 (Produce railcar pool account) and 2003 c 191 s 6;(12) RCW 48.160.005 (Guaranteed asset protection waiver account) and 2009 c 334 s 10;(13) RCW 82.32.800 (Contributions of high-technology research and development tax creditâOpportunity expansion account) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 10; and(14) RCW 82.45.240 (Down payment assistance account) and 2024 c 168 s 1 & 2023 c 337 s 9.Sec. 2. RCW 18.79.202 and 2023 c 123 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In addition to the licensing fee for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under this chapter and for nurses who hold a valid multistate license issued by the state of Washington under chapter 18.80 RCW, the department shall impose an additional surcharge of eight dollars per year on all initial licenses and renewal licenses for registered nurses and licensed practical nurses issued under this chapter. Advanced registered nurse practitioners are only required to pay the surcharge on their registered nurse licenses.(2) The department, in consultation with the board and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall use the proceeds from the surcharge imposed under subsection (1) of this section to provide grants to a central nursing resource center. The grants may be awarded only to a not-for-profit central nursing resource center that is comprised of and led by nurses. The central nursing resource center will demonstrate coordination with relevant nursing constituents including professional nursing organizations, groups representing nursing educators, staff nurses, nurse managers or executives, and labor organizations representing nurses. The central nursing resource center shall have as its mission to contribute to the health and wellness of Washington state residents by ensuring that there is an adequate nursing workforce to meet the current and future health care needs of the citizens of the state of Washington. The grants may be used to fund the following activities of the central nursing resource center:(a) Maintain information on the current and projected supply and demand of nurses through the collection and analysis of data regarding the nursing workforce, including but not limited to education level, race and ethnicity, employment settings, nursing positions, reasons for leaving the nursing profession, and those leaving Washington state to practice elsewhere. This data collection and analysis must complement other state activities to produce data on the nursing workforce and the central nursing resource center shall work collaboratively with other entities in the data collection to ensure coordination and avoid duplication of efforts;(b) Monitor and validate trends in the applicant pool for programs in nursing. The central nursing resource center must work with nursing leaders to identify approaches to address issues arising related to the trends identified, and collect information on other states' approaches to addressing these issues;(c) Facilitate partnerships between the nursing community and other health care providers, licensing authority, business and industry, consumers, legislators, and educators to achieve policy consensus, promote diversity within the profession, and enhance nursing career mobility and nursing leadership development;(d) Evaluate the effectiveness of nursing education and articulation among programs to increase access to nursing education and enhance career mobility, especially for populations that are underrepresented in the nursing profession;(e) Provide consultation, technical assistance, data, and information related to Washington state and national nursing resources;(f) Promote strategies to enhance patient safety and quality patient care including encouraging a safe and healthy workplace environment for nurses; and(g) Educate the public including students in K-12 about opportunities and careers in nursing.(3) The nursing resource center account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the surcharge in subsection (1) of this section must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for grants to an organization to conduct the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of this section and to compensate the department for the reasonable costs associated with the collection and distribution of the surcharge and the administration of the grant provided for in subsection (2) of this section. No money from this account may be used by the recipient towards administrative costs of the central nursing resource center not associated with the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of this section. No money from this account may be used by the recipient toward lobbying. Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Grants will be awarded on an annual basis and funds will be distributed quarterly. The department shall distribute the funds no more than 30 days after the central nursing resource center submits to the department an invoice and any additional documentation required by the department. The first distribution after awarding the first grant shall be made no later than six months after July 24, 2005. The central nursing resource center shall report to the department on meeting the grant objectives annually.(4) The central nursing resource center shall submit a report of all progress, collaboration with other organizations and government entities, and activities conducted by the center to the relevant committees of the legislature by November 30, 2011. The department shall conduct a review of the program to collect funds to support the activities of a nursing resource center and make recommendations on the effectiveness of the program and whether it should continue. The review shall be paid for with funds from the nursing resource center account. The review must be completed by June 30, 2012.(5) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement chapter 268, Laws of 2005.Sec. 3. RCW 19.285.060 and 2021 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a qualifying utility that fails to comply with the energy conservation or renewable energy targets established in RCW 19.285.040 shall pay an administrative penalty to the state of Washington in the amount of fifty dollars for each megawatt-hour of shortfall. Beginning in 2007, this penalty shall be adjusted annually according to the rate of change of the inflation indicator, gross domestic product-implicit price deflator, as published by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce or its successor.(2) A qualifying utility that does not meet an annual renewable energy target established in RCW 19.285.040(2) or biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation in RCW 19.285.040(1) is exempt from the administrative penalty in subsection (1) of this section for that year if the commission for investor-owned utilities or the auditor for all other qualifying utilities determines that the utility complied with RCW 19.285.040 (1)(e) or (2) (d) or (i) or 19.285.050(1).(3) A qualifying utility must notify its retail electric customers in published form within three months of incurring a penalty regarding the size of the penalty and the reason it was incurred.(4) The commission shall determine if an investor-owned utility may recover the cost of this administrative penalty in electric rates, and may consider providing positive incentives for an investor-owned utility to exceed the targets established in RCW 19.285.040.(5) ((Administrative penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the energy independence act special account which is hereby created. All receipts from administrative penalties collected under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purchase of renewable energy credits or for energy conservation projects at public facilities, local government facilities, community colleges, or state universities. The state shall own and retire any renewable energy credits purchased using moneys from the account. Only the director of enterprise services or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.(6))) For a qualifying utility that is an investor-owned utility, the commission shall determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter and assess penalties for noncompliance as provided in subsection (1) of this section.(((7)))(6) For qualifying utilities that are not investor-owned utilities, the auditor is responsible for auditing compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter that apply to those utilities and the attorney general is responsible for enforcing that compliance.Sec. 4. RCW 28A.505.130 and 2023 c 435 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:For each fund contained in the school district budget the estimated expenditures for the budgeted fiscal year must not be greater than the total of the estimated revenues for the budgeted fiscal year, the estimated fund balance at the beginning of the budgeted fiscal year less the estimated reserve fund balance at the end of the budgeted fiscal year, and the projected revenue from receivables collectible on future years as approved by the superintendent of public instruction for inclusion in the budget.The proceeds of any interfund loan must not be used to balance the budget of the borrowing fund, except in fiscal year 2024 when such loans may be used to address budget destabilization in the aftermath of the COVID-19 pandemic. Interfund loans in fiscal year 2024 may be for a duration of ((two))four years.Sec. 5. RCW 43.07.370 and 2019 c 448 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of state may solicit and accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for the following purposes:(a) Conducting the Washington state legacy project;(b) Archival activities;(c) Washington state library activities;(d) Development, construction, and operation of the Washington state library-archives building; and(e) Donation of Washington state flags.(3)(a) Moneys received under subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this section must be deposited in the Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account established in RCW 43.07.380.(b) Moneys received under subsection (2)(d) of this section must be deposited in the Washington state library-archives building account created in RCW 43.07.410.(c) Moneys received under subsection (2)(e) of this section must be deposited in the ((Washington state flag account))secretary of state's revolving fund created in RCW ((43.07.388))43.07.130.(4) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.Sec. 6. RCW 43.330.400 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The federal broadband ((mapping)) account is ((established))created in the ((custody of the state treasurer))state treasury. ((The department shall deposit into the account such))All receipts from funds received from legislative appropriation or transfer, federal funding, and ((donated funds from private and public sources))moneys directed to the account from any other lawful source, must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for ((the purposes of RCW 43.330.403 through 43.330.409. Only the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures))broadband activities authorized under federal law and for nonfederal match requirements.(2) ((The department is the single eligible entity in the state for purposes of the federal broadband mapping activities.(3))) Federal funding received by the department from the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (the infrastructure investment and jobs act) or a substantially similar successor federal program, must be deposited into the account for broadband ((mapping)) activities and must be used in accordance with any federal requirements and, subject to those requirements, may be distributed by the department on a competitive basis to other entities in the state.(((4) The department shall consult with the office of financial management and the utilities and transportation commission in coordinating broadband mapping activities. In carrying out any broadband mapping activities, the provisions of P.L. 110-385, Title I, regarding trade secrets, commercial or financial information, and privileged or confidential information submitted by the federal communications commission or a broadband provider are deemed to encompass the consulted agencies.))Sec. 7. RCW 48.160.020 and 2009 c 334 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) This chapter applies only to guaranteed asset protection waivers for financing of motor vehicles as defined in this chapter. Any person or entity must register with the commissioner before marketing, offering for sale or selling a guaranteed asset protection waiver, and before acting as an obligor for a guaranteed asset protection waiver, in this state. However, a retail seller of motor vehicles that assigns more than eighty-five percent of guaranteed asset protection waiver agreements within thirty days of such agreements' effective date, or an insurer authorized to transact such insurance business in this state, are not required to register pursuant to this section. Failure of any retail seller of motor vehicles to assign one hundred percent of guaranteed asset protection waiver agreements within forty-five days of such agreements' effective date will result in that retail seller being required to comply with the registration requirements of this chapter.(2) No person may market, offer for sale, or sell a guaranteed asset protection waiver, or act as an obligor on a guaranteed asset protection waiver in this state without a registration as provided in this chapter, except as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.(3) The application for registration must include the following:(a) The applicant's name, address, and telephone number;(b) The identities of the applicant's executive officers or other officers directly responsible for the waiver business;(c) An application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, which shall be deposited into the ((guaranteed asset protection waiver account))general fund;(d) A copy filed by the applicant with the commissioner of the waivers the applicant intends to offer in this state;(e) A list of all unregistered marketers of guaranteed asset protection waivers on which the applicant will be the obligor;(f) Such additional information as the commissioner may reasonably require.(4) Once registered, the applicant shall keep the information required for registration current by reporting changes within thirty days after the end of the month in which the change occurs.Sec. 8. RCW 69.51A.230 and 2022 c 16 s 127 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department must contract with an entity to create, administer, and maintain a secure and confidential medical cannabis authorization database that allows:(a) A cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement to add a qualifying patient or designated provider and include the amount of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or plants for which the qualifying patient is authorized under RCW 69.51A.210;(b) Persons authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled substances to access health care information on their patients for the purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical care for their patients;(c) A qualifying patient or designated provider to request and receive his or her own health care information or information on any person or entity that has queried their name or information;(d) Appropriate local, state, tribal, and federal law enforcement or prosecutorial officials who are engaged in a bona fide specific investigation of suspected cannabis-related activity that may be illegal under Washington state law to confirm the validity of the recognition card of a qualifying patient or designated provider;(e) A cannabis retailer holding a medical cannabis endorsement to confirm the validity of the recognition card of a qualifying patient or designated provider;(f) The department of revenue to verify tax exemptions under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW;(g) The department and the health care professional's disciplining authorities to monitor authorizations and ensure compliance with this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW by their licensees; and(h) Authorizations to expire six months or one year after entry into the medical cannabis authorization database, depending on whether the authorization is for a minor or an adult.(2) A qualifying patient and his or her designated provider, if any, may be placed in the medical cannabis authorization database at a cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement. After a qualifying patient or designated provider is placed in the medical cannabis authorization database, he or she must be provided with a recognition card that contains identifiers required in subsection (3) of this section.(3) The recognition card requirements must be developed by the department in rule and include:(a) A randomly generated and unique identifying number;(b) For designated providers, the unique identifying number of the qualifying patient whom the provider is assisting;(c) A photograph of the qualifying patient's or designated provider's face taken by an employee of the cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement at the same time that the qualifying patient or designated provider is being placed in the medical cannabis authorization database in accordance with rules adopted by the department;(d) The amount of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or plants for which the qualifying patient is authorized under RCW 69.51A.210;(e) The effective date and expiration date of the recognition card;(f) The name of the health care professional who authorized the qualifying patient or designated provider; and(g) For the recognition card, additional security features as necessary to ensure its validity.(4)(a) For qualifying patients who are eighteen years of age or older and their designated providers, recognition cards are valid for one year from the date the health care professional issued the authorization. For qualifying patients who are under the age of eighteen and their designated providers, recognition cards are valid for six months from the date the health care professional issued the authorization. Qualifying patients may not be reentered into the medical cannabis authorization database until they have been reexamined by a health care professional and determined to meet the definition of qualifying patient. After reexamination, a cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement must reenter the qualifying patient or designated provider into the medical cannabis authorization database and a new recognition card will then be issued in accordance with department rules.(b) A qualifying patient's registration in the medical cannabis authorization database and his or her recognition card may be renewed by a qualifying patient's designated provider without the physical presence of the qualifying patient at the retailer if the authorization from the health care professional indicates that the qualifying patient qualifies for a compassionate care renewal, as provided in RCW 69.51A.030. A qualifying patient receiving renewals under the compassionate care renewal provisions is exempt from the photograph requirements under subsection (3)(c) of this section.(5) If a recognition card is lost or stolen, a cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement, in conjunction with the database administrator, may issue a new card that will be valid for six months to one year if the patient is reexamined by a health care professional and determined to meet the definition of qualifying patient and depending on whether the patient is under the age of eighteen or eighteen years of age or older as provided in subsection (4) of this section. If a reexamination is not performed, the expiration date of the replacement recognition card must be the same as the lost or stolen recognition card.(6) The database administrator must remove qualifying patients and designated providers from the medical cannabis authorization database upon expiration of the recognition card. Qualifying patients and designated providers may request to remove themselves from the medical cannabis authorization database before expiration of a recognition card and health care professionals may request to remove qualifying patients and designated providers from the medical cannabis authorization database if the patient or provider no longer qualifies for the medical use of cannabis. The database administrator must retain database records for at least five calendar years to permit the state liquor and cannabis board and the department of revenue to verify eligibility for tax exemptions.(7) During development of the medical cannabis authorization database, the database administrator must consult with the department, stakeholders, and persons with relevant expertise to include, but not be limited to, qualifying patients, designated providers, health care professionals, state and local law enforcement agencies, and the University of Washington computer science and engineering security and privacy research lab or a certified cybersecurity firm, vendor, or service.(8) The medical cannabis authorization database must meet the following requirements:(a) Any personally identifiable information included in the database must be nonreversible, pursuant to definitions and standards set forth by the national institute of standards and technology;(b) Any personally identifiable information included in the database must not be susceptible to linkage by use of data external to the database;(c) The database must incorporate current best differential privacy practices, allowing for maximum accuracy of database queries while minimizing the chances of identifying the personally identifiable information included therein; and(d) The database must be upgradable and updated in a timely fashion to keep current with state of the art privacy and security standards and practices.(9)(a) Personally identifiable information of qualifying patients and designated providers included in the medical cannabis authorization database is confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.(b) Information contained in the medical cannabis authorization database may be released in aggregate form, with all personally identifiable information redacted, for the purpose of statistical analysis and oversight of agency performance and actions.(c) Information contained in the medical cannabis authorization database shall not be shared with the federal government or its agents unless the particular qualifying patient or designated provider is convicted in state court for violating this chapter or chapter 69.50 RCW.(10) The department must charge a one dollar fee for each initial and renewal recognition card issued by a cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement. The cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement shall collect the fee from the qualifying patient or designated provider at the time that he or she is entered into the database and issued a recognition card. The department shall establish a schedule for cannabis retailers with a medical cannabis endorsement to remit the fees collected. Fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the dedicated cannabis account created under RCW 69.50.530.(11) If the database administrator fails to comply with this section, the department may cancel any contracts with the database administrator and contract with another database administrator to continue administration of the database. A database administrator who fails to comply with this section is subject to a fine of up to five thousand dollars in addition to any penalties established in the contract. Fines collected under this section must be deposited into the ((health professions))dedicated cannabis account created under RCW ((43.70.320))69.50.530.(12) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 9. RCW 72.09.095 and 1995 c 234 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Each year the ((department))state treasurer shall transfer ((twenty-five))25 percent of the total annual revenues and receipts received in ((each institutional betterment fund subaccount))the institutional welfare account, created in section 10 of this act, to the department of labor and industries for the purpose of providing direct benefits to crime victims through the crime victims' compensation program as outlined in chapter 7.68 RCW. ((This transfer takes priority over any expenditure of betterment funds and shall be reflected on the monthly financial statements of each institution's betterment fund subaccount.))For purposes of this section, revenues and receipts exclude those amounts transferred on July 1, 2025, from the incarcerated individual betterment fund established outside the state treasury provided those moneys have already been subject to the 25 percent transfer requirement contained herein.Any funds so transferred to the department of labor and industries shall be in addition to the crime victims' compensation amount provided in an omnibus appropriation bill. It is the intent of the legislature that the funds forecasted or transferred pursuant to this section shall not reduce the funding levels provided by appropriation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:The institutional welfare account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The account shall consist of all moneys in the incarcerated individual betterment fund held by the department as of July 1, 2025, and any revenue and receipts into the incarcerated individual betterment fund on or after July 1, 2025. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the benefit of incarcerated individuals within the department. Such benefits include, but are not limited to, support for family visitation, prison visiting areas and extended family visit programs, family-centered activities, law library books, subscriptions, recreation and hobby expenditures, reentry services, and television system, phone, and computer communication expenditures.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:Effective July 1, 2025, the moneys in the incarcerated individual betterment fund established outside the state treasury and held by the department must be deposited into the institutional welfare account created in section 10 of this act. On and after July 1, 2025, all revenues and receipts of the incarcerated individual betterment fund must be deposited into the institutional welfare account created in section 10 of this act. Beginning July 1, 2025, the department may not make expenditures or transfers from the incarcerated individual betterment fund, except to deposit moneys into the institutional welfare account created in section 10 of this act.Sec. 12. 1931 c 97 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:That said park shall constitute, be held and maintained as a part of the state parks system, with management and control of the same vested in the state parks committee. Said bonds and any other bonds purchased with said cash or with the principal proceeds of such bonds as mature shall be placed in the custody of the state treasurer. ((Said cash and any proceeds or income from said cash or bonds shall be placed in a special fund of the state treasury hereby created to be known as the Millersylvania Park trust fund, the moneys of which shall be deposited in a state depositary bank.)) Said cash and the principal proceeds from said bonds may be invested in the same manner and same class of bonds as the moneys of the common school fund; but such bonds and cash shall constitute a permanent, irreducible fund, the interest, income and earnings therefrom to be expended by the state parks committee for the improvement, maintenance and upkeep of said park in accordance with the terms of said will.Sec. 13. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2024 c 327 s 16 and 2024 c 168 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, ((the commemorative works account,)) the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, ((the juvenile accountability incentive account,)) the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the pollution liability insurance program trust account, ((the produce railcar pool account,)) the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, ((the Millersylvania park trust fund,)) the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative treasury trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 14. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2024 c 327 s 17 and 2024 c 168 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment and scholarship program account, the Billy Frank Jr. national statuary hall collection fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, ((the commemorative works account,)) the county 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the Fern Lodge maintenance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, ((the juvenile accountability incentive account,)) the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation account, the medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, ((the produce railcar pool account,)) the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, ((the Millersylvania park trust fund,)) the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, the Washington saves administrative treasury trust account, and the library operations account.(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 15. RCW 43.84.092 and 2024 c 210 s 4 and 2024 c 168 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, ((the education construction fund,)) the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.Sec. 16. RCW 43.84.092 and 2024 c 210 s 5 and 2024 c 168 s 13 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, ((the education construction fund,)) the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. Any residual balance of funds remaining in any account abolished in this act on July 1, 2025, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the state general fund except for the following accounts:(1) Any residual balance of funds remaining in the produce railcar pool account on July 1, 2025, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the multimodal transportation account.(2) Any residual balance of funds remaining in the commemorative works account on July 1, 2025, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the enterprise services account.(3) Any residual balance of funds remaining in the Millersylvania park trust fund on July 1, 2025, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Millersylvania park current account.(4) Any residual balance of funds remaining in the education construction fund on July 1, 2025, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the common school construction fund.(5) Any residual balance of funds remaining in the opportunity express account on July 1, 2025, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the employment service administration account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. (1) Section 13 of this act expires July 1, 2030.(2) Section 15 of this act expires July 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 19. (1) Section 14 of this act takes effect July 1, 2030.(2) Section 16 of this act takes effect July 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 20. (1) Sections 1 through 5, 7 through 13, 15, and 17 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2025.(2) Section 6 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---